Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4655.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 16149. (1) The department or a board shall not promulgate or enforce a rule requiring implicit bias training as a condition of licensure or registration or as a condition of license or registration renewal. (2) R 338.7004 of the Michigan Administrative Code is rescinded.